West Virginia, session 2025, HB3126.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. WEST VIRGINIA PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT ACT. §5-10-22o. Increase of benefits based on prior year's inflation rate for annuitants. As an additional supplement to other retirement allowances provided, each annuitant who on July 1, 2025 is receiving a retirement annuity and whose retirement allowance became effective more than five years prior to July 1, 2025, shall receive, upon application, an increased amount, payable monthly, which is based on the rate of inflation for the prior year.